Hawaii statutes.
[§136-5] Exemptions. Sections 136-3
and 136-4 shall not apply to any hand-held laser devices used in a recreational
activity commonly referred to as "laser tag", and which activity is
offered for a fee by an amusement or recreation facility, provided that the
devices shall be collected by the operator of the facility following their use.
[L 1999, c 94, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next